Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB669.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XII-AEARLY VOTING IN ELECTIONSSection 1201-A. Conduct of early voting.(a) Authority to conduct.--Each county board shall provide for a period of early voting in elections as provided for in 123456789101112131415161718192021 this article.(b) Issuance of ballots and voting booths.--(1) If a request is made to vote early by a registered elector, the county board shall issue a ballot to the registered elector, except in districts where voting machines are used in accordance with Article XI, for in-person early voting. Except as otherwise provided in this article, all ballots issued to registered electors for early voting must be voted on the premises of the county board and returned to the county board.(2) On the dates for early voting prescribed in section 1203-A, each county board shall provide voting booths with voting machines and other suitable equipment for voting on the premises of the county board and at any other early voting polling place designated by the county board for the conduct of early voting in accordance with this article.(c) Maintenance of list.--The county board shall maintain a list of all registered electors in each election district who vote during the early voting period. The list must be maintained for each election district in the county. Before the opening of the polls on election day, the county board shall deliver to the judges of elections in each election district the list of registered electors who have voted by early ballot.Section 1202-A. Permanent polling places for early voting.The following shall apply:(1) A county board may establish permanent polling places for in-person early voting at locations throughout the county in which the county board has jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, any school, county building or any other office or building owned or maintained by the county. A 20250HB0669PN0676 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered elector entitled to early voting may do so at any polling place established by the county board for early voting.(2) During each election, the county board, in a county with a population of more than 250,000, shall establish at least one permanent polling place for in-person early voting at a location within each of the three largest municipalities within the county board's jurisdiction. If the population of any of the three largest municipalities in the county is more than 80,000, the county board shall establish at least two permanent polling places within the municipality. All population figures shall be determined by the most recent Federal decennial census.(3) During each election, the county board in a county with a municipality with a population of more than 100,000, shall establish at least three permanent polling places for in-person early voting.(4) During each election, the county board in a county with a population of more than 100,000 but less than 250,000, shall establish at least one permanent polling place for in-person early voting.(5) The location for early voting may be the county board's main office or any other location designated by the county board for early voting. The county board may designate additional sites for in-person early voting as the county board deems appropriate.(6) A permanent polling place designated for early voting in accordance with this section may not be located within 1.5 miles of another permanent polling place required under this section, unless the permanent polling place is 20250HB0669PN0676 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within a municipality with a population of 500,000 or more.(7) All population figures enumerated in this section shall be determined by the most recent Federal decennial census.Section 1203-A. Period for early voting.(a) Commencement and end of early voting.--The period for in-person early voting shall begin the 30th day preceding the date of an election and extend through the end of the day before election day.(b) Schedules of early voting.--Except as provided under subsection (c), the following apply:(1) Except as provided under paragraphs (2) and (3), a permanent polling place for early voting must remain open beginning the 30th day before an election through the end of the day before election day as follows:(i) during the hours of 8:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. or 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. on weekdays; and(ii) during the hours of 9 a.m. to 12 noon on Saturdays and holidays and 10 a.m. to 4 p.m. on Sundays.(2) Eight days before election day a permanent polling place for early voting must remain open during the hours of 8:30 a.m. to 7 p.m. or 9 a.m. to 7 p.m.(3) In addition to the hours prescribed under paragraphs (1) and (2), a permanent polling place designated by a county board under section 1202-A must remain open for a total of at least eight hours on any holiday during the early voting period and a total of at least 14 hours on the final weekend during the early voting period.(c) Emergency closure of polling place.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), a county board may close an early voting polling 20250HB0669PN0676 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 place if the building in which the polling place is located has been closed by a State, county or local agency in response to a severe weather emergency or other emergency. The county board shall notify the Secretary of the Commonwealth of any closure and shall make reasonable efforts to provide notice to the public of an alternative polling place for early voting.Section 1204-A. Designation of temporary polling places.(a) Temporary polling places.--In addition to permanent polling places for early voting under section 1202-A, the county board may establish temporary polling places for early voting.(b) Applicability of schedule.--The schedules for the conduct of early voting under section 1203-A(b) shall not apply to temporary polling places. Early voting at temporary polling places may be conducted on any one or more days and during any hours within the early voting period established for in-person early voting under section 1203-A(b), as determined by the county board. The schedules for the conduct of early voting at a temporary polling place do not need to be uniform among the temporary polling places.Section 1205-A. Use of public buildings as polling places.Upon request by a county board, the governing body of a municipality shall make public buildings within the county available as permanent or temporary early voting polling places without charge. Any request to use a public building shall include reasonably necessary time before and after the period that early voting will be conducted at the public building. A municipality making a public building available as a permanent or temporary early voting polling place shall ensure that any portion of the building made available is accessible to voters with disabilities and elderly voters.20250HB0669PN0676 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1206-A. Publication of early voting locations and schedules.(a) Notice.--During the week immediately preceding the commencement of early voting and at least once each week during the period of early voting, the county board shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a schedule stating:(1) the location of each permanent and temporary early voting polling place and the election districts served by each such polling place; and(2) the dates and hours that early voting will be conducted at each temporary early voting polling place.(b) Posting requirements.--Each county board shall post a copy of the schedule at an office or other location that is to be used as a temporary early voting polling place. The schedule must be posted continuously for a period beginning not later than the 10th day before the commencement of early voting and ending on the last day of the early voting period.(c) Copies.--The county board must make copies of the schedule available to the public in reasonable quantities without charge during the period of posting.(d) Electronic posting.--If the county board maintains a publicly accessible Internet website, the county board shall make the schedule available on the website.(e) Prohibition and exception after schedule publication.--Additional permanent early voting polling places may not be established after the schedule is published under this section. Additional temporary early voting polling places may be established after the schedule is published if the temporary early voting polling places are open to all registered electors. 20250HB0669PN0676 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The locations, dates and hours of all additional temporary early voting polling places shall be reported to the Secretary of the Commonwealth and posted on the county board's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1207-A. List of polling places.At least 10 days before the commencement of early voting, each county board shall provide the Secretary of the Commonwealth with a list of all permanent and temporary early voting polling places and the hours each polling place will be open for early voting.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0669PN0676 - 7 - 1234567891011